Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-1240
Nonprofit development organization; annual report; contents; final report; failure to file; civil penalty; applicability of section.

(1) Each nonprofit development organization shall submit an annual report to the director to be included as a part of the department's annual status report required under section 81-1201.11. The report shall certify that the workforce housing investment fund meets the requirements of the Middle Income Workforce Housing Investment Act and shall include a breakdown of program activities.

(2) The annual report shall include, but not be limited to:

(a) The name and geographical location of the nonprofit development organization;

(b) The number, amount, and type of workforce housing investment funds invested in qualified activities;

(c) The number, geographical location, type, and amount of investments made;

(d) A summary of matching funds and where such matching funds were generated;

(e) The results of the annual audit required under subdivision (4)(d) of section 81-1238; and

(f) The number of tenants assisted into homeownership, if applicable.

(3) If a nonprofit development organization ceases administration of a workforce housing investment fund, it shall file a final report with the director in a form and manner required by the director. Before July 1, 2029, any unallocated workforce housing investment fund grant funds shall be returned for credit to the Middle Income Workforce Housing Investment Fund. On and after July 1, 2029, any unallocated workforce housing investment fund grant funds shall be returned to the department for transfer to the General Fund.

(4) If a workforce housing investment fund fails to file a complete annual report by February 15, the director may, in his or her discretion, impose a civil penalty of not more than five thousand dollars for such violation. All money collected by the department pursuant to this subsection shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.

(5) This section does not apply to the subaccount of the Middle Income Workforce Housing Investment Fund described in subsection (2) of section 81-1239.

Laws 2020, LB866, § 16;

Laws 2022, LB1024, § 12;

Laws 2022, LB1069, § 7;

Laws 2023, LB531, § 35;

Laws 2025, LB288, § 17.